Mississippi, session 2026, SB2206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 47-7-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-4.  (1)  The commissioner and the medical director of the department may place an offender who has served not less than one (1) year of his or her sentence, except an offender convicted of a sex crime, on conditional medical release.  However, a nonviolent offender who is bedridden or has a long-term debilitating medical condition may be placed on conditional medical release regardless of the time served on his or her sentence.  Upon the release of a nonviolent offender who is bedridden, the state shall not be responsible or liable for any medical costs that may be incurred if such costs are acquired after the offender is no longer incarcerated due to his or her placement on conditional medical release.  The commissioner shall not place an offender on conditional medical release unless the medical director of the department certifies to the commissioner that (a) the offender is suffering from a * * * significant permanent physical long-term debilitating medical condition with no possibility of recovery; (b) that his or her further incarceration will serve no rehabilitative purposes; and (c) that the state would incur unreasonable expenses as a result of his or her continued incarceration.  Any offender placed on conditional medical release shall be supervised by the Division of Community Corrections of the department for the remainder of his or her sentence and may be placed in the Intensive Supervision Program as provided in Section 47-5-1001 et seq.  An offender's conditional medical release may be revoked and the offender returned and placed in actual custody of the department if the offender violates an order or condition of his or her conditional medical release.  An offender who is no longer bedridden or suffering from a long-term debilitating medical condition shall be returned and placed in the actual custody of the department. (2)  (a)  The State Parole Board may grant a medical parole and referral to licensed special care facilities for paroled inmates for an inmate determined to be "medically frail" as defined in this subsection. (b)  For purposes of this subsection (2), the term "medically frail" means an individual who has a mental or physical medical condition from which he or she, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, is not expected to recover and as a result cannot perform daily living activities and who is a minimal threat to society as a result of the mental or physical medical condition. (c)  The following conditions apply to a parole granted under this subsection (2): (i)  An inmate who has been sentenced to capital punishment is not eligible; (ii)  An inmate who has been convicted as a criminal sex offender is not eligible; (iii)  An inmate does not pose a public safety risk or risk of flight as determined by the State Parole Board; (iv)  If the prisoner is incapacitated as a result of a mental or physical medical condition as prescribed under paragraph (b) of this subsection, an individual legally entitled to agree to the inmate's placement agrees to the inmate's placement in a licensed special care facility for paroled inmates or in a medical facility where medical care and treatment are determined to be appropriate for the parolee by the State Parole Board; (v)  An inmate shall agree to the release of his or her medical records that are directly relevant to the condition or conditions rendering the inmate medically frail to any prosecuting attorney of the county from which the inmate was committed before the State Parole Board determines whether or not to grant parole under this subsection; (vi)  If the inmate is granted parole under this subsection (2), the inmate shall agree to the quarterly release of his or her medical records that are directly relevant to the condition or conditions rendering the inmate medically frail at the request of any prosecuting attorney of the county from which the inmate was committed; (vii)  The parolee shall adhere to the terms of his or her parole for the length of his or her parole term, and the parole shall be for a term not less than the time necessary to reach the prisoner's earliest release date; (viii)  The department or the State Parole Board shall not retain authority over the medical treatment plan for the inmate granted parole under this subsection (2); (ix)  The department and the State Parole Board shall ensure that the placement and terms and conditions of parole granted under this subsection (2) do not violate any other state or federal regulations; (x)  A facility utilized by the department to facilitate parole under this subsection (2) shall be operated in a manner that ensures the safety of the residents of the facility; (xi)  If the inmate recovers from the mental or physical medical condition that rendered the inmate medically frail under this subsection (2), the State Parole Board shall revoke the parole granted under this subsection (2), and the department shall ensure that the inmate returns to incarceration. (d)  The Mississippi Department of Corrections may enter into contracts to facilitate the housing of paroled inmates under this subsection (2).  The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall appoint a specialist in the appropriate field of medicine, who is not employed by the department, to evaluate the condition of the inmate considered for parole under this subsection (2) and to report on that condition to the department and the State Parole Board.  The State Parole Board shall determine whether the inmate is medically frail in consultation with the Mississippi Department of Health. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.